District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2305.06

Board of Occupational Therapy Practice -- Powers and duties

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(i), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1705.1 to 2-1705.18.